Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.25.370.
Filing of articles, certificates, and affidavits.

Articles of incorporation, amendment, consolidation, merger, conversion, or dissolution, when executed and acknowledged and accompanied by the affidavits required by this chapter, shall be presented to the commissioner for filing.
Upon finding that the articles presented conform to the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner, upon payment of the fees provided in this chapter, shall file the articles in the records of the commissioner’s office. Upon filing, the incorporation, amendment, consolidation, merger, conversion, or dissolution provided for is in effect. This section also applies to certificates of election to dissolve and affidavits executed under AS

10.25.320

—

10.25.360

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.375.
Cancellation of certificates issued and filings accepted.

The commissioner may, within one year after a filing, and after written notice to the cooperative or individual making a filing, cancel a certificate issued or filing accepted under this chapter, on any ground existing at the time notice of cancellation is made for which the commissioner could have originally refused to issue the certificate or accept the filing. The notice of cancellation must state the reason for the proposed cancellation.
A cooperative or individual may request a hearing within 90 days after receipt of the notice. The notice of cancellation becomes final if the cooperative or individual does not request a hearing within 90 days after receipt of notice.
Notice of cancellation must be sent by certified mail with return receipt requested.
If the return receipt is not received by the department within a reasonable time and the department has made diligent inquiry as to the current address of the corporation, notice may be made by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the vicinity of the registered office of the cooperative or the address of the individual who made the filing, and the cancellation becomes final 60 days after publication of the notice.

History.

(§ 68 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.380.
Nonprofit operation.

A cooperative shall be operated on a nonprofit basis for the mutual benefit of its members and patrons.
The bylaws of a cooperative or its contracts with members and patrons must contain such provisions relating to the disposition of revenues and receipts as may be necessary and appropriate to establish and maintain its nonprofit and cooperative character.

History.

(§ 23 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.390.
Disposition of property to secure indebtedness.

The board of directors of a cooperative may, without authorization by the members of the cooperative, authorize the execution and delivery of mortgages or deeds of trust of, or the pledging or encumbering of, the property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises and permits of the cooperative, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, as well as the revenue therefrom, upon the terms and conditions the board of directors determines, to secure an indebtedness of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 24(1) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1970)

Sec. 10.25.400.
Limitations on disposition of property.

A cooperative may not otherwise sell, lease, or dispose of more than 15 percent of the cooperative’s total assets, less depreciation, as reflected on the books of the cooperative at the time of the transaction unless the transaction is authorized under this section. The transaction is approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of the members voting on the transaction if the number of members voting to approve it constitutes a majority of all the members of the cooperative. However, notwithstanding a provision of this chapter or any other provision of law, the board of directors may, upon the authorization of a majority of those members of the cooperative voting on the issue in an election in which at least 10 percent of the eligible members return ballots, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial portion of its property to another cooperative or to the state if the sale complies with (d) of this section.

Before a vote to authorize the disposition or sale of more than 15 percent of the total assets of the cooperative, other than a vote to authorize disposition or sale to the state or another cooperative, the board of directors shall

have the tangible and intangible property that is proposed for sale appraised by two appraisers; one appraiser shall be chosen by the proposed buyer; the appraisers may not be associated with the cooperative or a proposed buyer of cooperative property; each appraiser shall deliver a copy of the appraisal to the cooperative and to the proposed buyer; the first proposed buyer shall advance to the cooperative money sufficient to pay for the appraisals; if a buyer other than the first proposed buyer purchases the assets based on the appraisals, the actual buyer shall reimburse the first proposed buyer for the cost of the appraisals;

notify all cooperative members, at least 90 days in advance, of a vote on disposition of cooperative property; the notice must contain detailed proposals for disposition of the property;

at least 90 days before the vote, notify all other cooperatives situated and operating in the state that the property is available for disposition and include with the notice one copy of each appraisal of the property;

at least 30 days before the vote, mail to all members any alternate proposals made by another cooperative, or by cooperative members if an alternate proposal signed by at least 50 members has been submitted to the board, together with any recommendation that the board has made; and

place each proposal for which notice has been given on the ballot.

This section does not apply to the transfer of cooperative property under AS

10.25.240

—

10.25.300

.

The sale of a cooperative may not take effect unless the purchaser expressly agrees to comply with the terms of each collective bargaining agreement entered into between the cooperative being sold and a labor organization representing employees of the cooperative that is in effect on the date of sale.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 29 SLA 2020.]

History.

(§ 24(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 1970; am §§ 21, 22 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 2000; am § 22 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, repealed (e).

Sec. 10.25.410.
Nonliability of members for debts of cooperative.

A member is not liable or responsible for any debts of the cooperative and the property of the members is not subject to execution therefor.

History.

(§ 25 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.420.
Effect of recordation of mortgages and other instruments.

A mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a cooperative, which affects real and personal property and which is recorded in the real property records in the city, borough, or other recording districts in which the property is located or is to be located has the same effect as if recorded, filed, or indexed as provided by law in the proper office in the city, borough, or other recording district as a mortgage of personal property.
All after-acquired property of the cooperative described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged in a mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument is subject to the lien thereof immediately upon the acquisition of such property by the cooperative, whether or not the property was in existence at the time of the execution of the mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument.
Recordation of such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument constitutes notice and has the same effect with respect to after-acquired property as it has under the laws relating to recordation of property owned by the cooperative at the time of the execution of the mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument and described in it or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged thereby.
The lien of such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument upon personal property after its recordation continues for the period of time specified in the instrument without refiling or the filing of a renewal certificate, affidavit or other supplemental information required by the laws relating to the renewal, maintenance or extension of liens upon personal property.

History.

(§ 26 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.430.
Validity of mortgage under Rural Electrification Act.

A mortgage made by a cooperative organized under this chapter to the United States of America, or an agency or instrumentality of it, to secure indebtedness incurred under 7 U.S.C. 901 — 950bb-2 (Rural Electrification Act ), as amended, is not void as against creditors of the mortgagor and subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers of the property in good faith for value because the mortgage is not accompanied by an affidavit of the parties to it, or an affidavit of the agent or attorney-in-fact of a party to it, that the mortgage is made in good faith to secure the amount named, and without a design to hinder, delay or defraud creditors. A mortgage made by a cooperative organized under this chapter to the United States of America, or an agency or instrumentality of it to secure indebtedness incurred under 7 U.S.C. 901 — 950bb-2 (Rural Electrification Act ), as amended, need not set out the date upon which the indebtedness secured by it becomes due.

History.

(§ 26 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “attorney-in-fact” for “attorney in fact” in this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, updated internal references
and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 10.25.440.
Construction standards.

Construction of electric lines and facilities, or telephone lines and facilities, by a cooperative shall, as a minimum requirement, comply with the standards of the National Electrical Safety Code in effect at the time of construction.

History.

(§ 27 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

Sec. 10.25.450.
Directors, officers, or members as notaries.

A person authorized to take acknowledgments under the laws of this state is not disqualified from taking acknowledgments of instruments to which a cooperative is a party because the person is an officer, director, or member of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 28 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.460.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each cooperative shall have and continuously maintain in the state a registered

office, which may be, but need not be, the same as the location of the principal office;

agent who is either an individual resident in the state whose business office is identical with the registered office or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state whose business office is identical with the registered office.

History.

(§ 29 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 17 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (2), added “either” following “agent who is”, added “or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state whose business office is identical with the registered office” at the end, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 10.25.470.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A cooperative may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the commissioner a statement setting forth

the name of the cooperative;

the address of its registered office;

if the address of its registered office is changed, the address of the new registered office;

the name of the registered agent;

if its registered agent is changed, the name of its new registered agent;

that the address of its registered office and the address of the business office and its registered agent, as changed, will be identical;

that such change was authorized by resolution adopted by its board of directors.

History.

(§ 30 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.480.
Execution and filing of statement.

The statement of change of office or agent shall be executed by the cooperative by its presiding officer and directed to the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the statement conforms to this chapter, the commissioner shall file it in the commissioner’s office. Upon the filing, the change of address of the registered office, and the appointment of the registered agent, or both, as the case may be, is effective.

History.

(§ 30 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 99 SLA 1995; am § 39 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.25.490.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent of a cooperative may resign by filing a written notice of resignation, executed in duplicate, with the commissioner.
The commissioner shall immediately mail a copy of it to the cooperative at its registered office.
The appointment of the agent terminates 30 days after receipt of the notice by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 30 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.500.
Service on cooperative.

The registered agent of a cooperative is an agent of the cooperative upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the cooperative may be served.

When a cooperative fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the state, or when its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the commissioner is an agent of the cooperative upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served.

History.

(§ 31 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.510.
Service on commissioner.

Service on the commissioner is made by delivering to and leaving with the commissioner, or with a clerk having charge of the corporation department of the commissioner’s office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. The commissioner shall immediately have one copy forwarded by registered mail, addressed to the cooperative at its registered office. Service on the commissioner is returnable in not less than 30 days.

The commissioner shall keep a record of each process, notice, and demand served under this section, and shall record the time of service and the commissioner’s action with reference to it.

History.

(§ 31 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.520.
Other means of service not affected.

Nothing in AS

10.25.500

and

10.25.510

limits or affects the right to serve process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on a cooperative in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

(§ 31 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.530.
Fees.

The commissioner shall establish by regulation and charge and collect fees for

filing articles of incorporation;

filing articles of amendment;

filing articles of consolidation or merger;

filing articles of conversion;

filing certificate of election to dissolve;

filing articles of dissolution;

filing certificate of change of principal office and designation or change of registered office and registered agent; and

acting as agent for service of process.

The department may by regulation charge each cooperative subject to this chapter a fixed fee in place of the various fees specified in this chapter and for the routine administrative services rendered to the corporation by the department.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 32 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 52 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 69 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 22, 23 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 14 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.25.540.
Business license and taxation of cooperatives.

Cooperatives under this chapter shall apply for a business license and pay the initial license fee as provided by the Alaska Business License Act (AS 43.70), as amended.

Before March 1 of each year,

each telephone cooperative shall pay to the state, instead of state and local ad valorem, income, and excise taxes that may be assessed or levied, a percentage of its gross revenue earned during the preceding calendar year;

each electric cooperative shall pay to the state, instead of state and local ad valorem, income, and excise taxes that may be assessed or levied, a tax on the number of kilowatt hours of electricity sold at retail by the cooperative during the preceding calendar year.

History.

(§ 33 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.550.
Amount of telephone cooperative gross revenue tax.

The telephone cooperative gross revenue tax shall be computed as follows:

one percent of gross revenue for cooperatives that have furnished telephone service to consumers for less than five years as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year;

two percent of gross revenue for cooperatives that have furnished telephone service to consumers for five years or longer as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year.

History.

(§ 33 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.555.
Amount of electric cooperative tax.

The electric cooperative tax shall be computed as follows:

one-fourth mill per kilowatt hour for cooperatives that have furnished electric energy and power to consumers for less than five years as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year;

one-half mill per kilowatt hour for cooperatives that have furnished electric energy and power to consumers for five years or longer as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year.

In this section, “mill” means one-tenth of one cent.

History.

(§ 3 ch 74 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.560.
Manner of computing telephone cooperative gross revenue.

Gross revenue of a telephone cooperative includes all revenue earned from local and toll services.

History.

(§ 33 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 74 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.570.
Refund to local governments.

The proceeds of the telephone cooperative gross revenue tax and the electric cooperative tax, less the amount expended by the state in their collection, shall be refunded to an organized borough or a city of any class incorporated under state law, in the proportion that the revenue was earned within the city or the borough area outside the city. However, taxes collected on gross revenue earned by a telephone cooperative or on the sale of electricity by an electric cooperative outside a city or organized borough shall be retained by the state and deposited into its general fund.

History.

(§ 33 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 241 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.25.580.
Inventory and fixtures subject to taxation.

The inventory and fixtures of a business operated by a cooperative incidental to the furnishing of central station electric service, including, without limitation, appliance stores or departments, are not exempt from ad valorem taxes. The inventory and accounts of these businesses shall be separately maintained and taxes shall be paid upon them as provided by law.

History.

(§ 33 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.590.
Connection and interconnection of facilities.

A telephone cooperative organized or doing business under this chapter, hereafter designated as applicant, may require a person furnishing telephone service to the public in the state, hereafter designated as company, to interconnect its lines, facilities or systems with, or otherwise make available the lines, facilities or systems to, the applicant’s telephone lines, facilities or systems, in order to provide a continuous line of communication for the applicant’s subscribers.
If the company and the applicant are unable to agree upon the terms and conditions of interconnection, including compensation, the superior court shall, upon petition of the parties, or either of them, establish the terms and conditions.
The terms and conditions shall be reasonable and nondiscriminatory.

History.

(§ 34 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.600.
Correction of defectively organized cooperatives.

If a cooperative has filed defective articles of incorporation, or has failed to do all things necessary to perfect its corporate organization, it may file corrected articles of incorporation, or amend the original articles, and do and perform all acts and things necessary for the correction of the defects.
The action so taken is valid and binding upon all persons concerned.
The capacity of the cooperative to file corrected articles of incorporation or amendments to the original articles, or to do and perform all acts and things necessary, may not be questioned.

History.

(§ 37 ch 93 SLA 1959)